Illinois, session 104th, SB690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 24-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/24-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 24-101)7    Sec. 24-101. Notwithstanding any law to the the contrary, 8the State of Illinois or any unit of local government or school 9district may enter into a written contract with any of its 10employees to defer a part of their gross compensation and may 11invest such funds in any such manner as prescribed by the 12deferred compensation program adopted by it under this 13Article. Compensation deferred pursuant to a deferred 14compensation program adopted under this Article shall not 15exceed the amount of compensation allowed to be deferred 16without being subject to income tax in the year in which it is 17earned, pursuant to Section 457 of the United States Internal 18Revenue Code or laws supplementary or amendatory thereto.19    It is hereby declared to be in the public interest to 20provide public employees with a plan for the deferral of 21compensation and the accrual of income and gain thereon if 22such deferred compensation be invested, and to encourage the 23continued service of public employees by making available such   SB0690- 2 -LRB104 06998 RPS 17035 b1benefits to them.2(Source: P.A. 82-145.)